District of Columbia statutes.
29-402.03

Incorporation.

(a)

Unless a delayed effective date is specified, the corporate existence begins when the articles of incorporation are filed.

(b)

The filing of the articles of incorporation by the Mayor is conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation except in a proceeding by the District to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the nonprofit corporation.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(d)(7), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “District” for “state” in (b).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.